Nebraska, session 109, LB95.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB95 LB95
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-1206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1206 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
administer the program of social services in this state. The department
may contract with other social agencies for the purchase of social
services at rates not to exceed those prevailing in the state or the cost
at which the department could provide those services. The statutory
maximum payments for the separate program of aid to dependent children
shall apply only to public assistance grants and shall not apply to
payments for social services.
(2)(a) As part of the provision of social services authorized by
section 68-1202, the department shall participate in the federal child
care assistance program under 42 U.S.C. 9857 et seq., as such sections
existed on January 1, 2023, and provide child care assistance to families
with incomes up to (i) one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal
poverty level prior to October 1, 2026, or (ii) one hundred thirty
percent of the federal poverty level on and after October 1, 2026.
(b)(i) As part of the provision of social services authorized by
this section and section 68-1202, the department shall participate in the
federal Child Care Subsidy program. A child care provider seeking to
participate in the federal Child Care Subsidy program shall comply with
the criminal history record information check requirements of the Child
Care Licensing Act. In determining ongoing eligibility for this program,
ten percent of a household's gross earned income shall be disregarded
after twelve continuous months on the program and at each subsequent
redetermination. In determining ongoing eligibility, if a family's income
exceeds one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level
prior to October 1, 2026, or one hundred thirty percent of the federal
poverty level on and after October 1, 2026, the family shall receive
transitional child care assistance through the remainder of the family's
eligibility period or until the family's income exceeds eighty-five
-2-

LB95 LB95
2025 2025
percent of the state median income for a family of the same size as
reported by the United States Bureau of the Census, whichever occurs
first. When the family's eligibility period ends, the family shall
continue to be eligible for transitional child care assistance if the
family's income is below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level
prior to October 1, 2026, or one hundred eighty-five percent of the
federal poverty level beginning on and after October 1, 2026. The family
shall receive transitional child care assistance through the remainder of
the transitional eligibility period or until the family's income exceeds
eighty-five percent of the state median income for a family of the same
size as reported by the United States Bureau of the Census, whichever
occurs first. The amount of such child care assistance shall be based on
a cost-shared plan between the recipient family and the state and shall
be based on a sliding-scale methodology. A recipient family may be
required to contribute a percentage of such family's gross income for
child care that is no more than the cost-sharing rates in the
transitional child care assistance program as of January 1, 2015, for
those no longer eligible for cash assistance as provided in section
68-1724.
(ii) The department shall create a pilot program to provide child
care assistance for the child care workforce as part of the federal Child
Care Subsidy program. The pilot program shall begin on October 1, 2025,
and terminate on September 30, 2028.
(iii) For the pilot program, eligible households shall:
(A) Have a household income equal to or less than eighty-five
percent of the state median income for a household of the same size as
reported by the United States Bureau of the Census at the time of
eligibility determination;
(B) Have an applicant or household member who is listed in the
Nebraska Early Childhood Professional Record System as described in
section 71-1962 and who, for a minimum of twenty hours per week:
-3-

LB95 LB95
2025 2025
(I) Is self-employed at a licensed child care program as described
in section 71-1911;
(II) Is employed at a licensed child care program as described in
section 71-1911;
(III) Is employed at a federal Head Start program as described in 42
U.S.C. 9831 et seq.; or
(IV) Is employed at an Early Head Start program as described in 42
U.S.C. 9840a; and
(C) Meet all non-income eligibility requirements of the federal
Child Care Subsidy program.
(iv) Eligible households receiving child care assistance as part of
the pilot program shall remain eligible for twelve continuous months
without a cost-share obligation if an applicant or household member
maintains employment in accordance with subdivision (2)(b)(iii)(B) of
this section.
(v) The department shall electronically submit an annual report to
the Legislature on December 1 of each year beginning December 1, 2026,
through December 1, 2028, that describes participation in the pilot
program. The report shall include:
(A) The monthly number of enrolled children and households by county
and type of employment described in subdivision (2)(b)(iii)(B) of this
section;
(B) The annual total of enrolled applicants or household members as
described in subdivision (2)(b)(iii)(B) of this section that are employed
in the child care industry for less than two months prior to enrollment
in the pilot program;
(C) The annual total of enrolled applicants or household members as
described in subdivision (2)(b)(iii)(B) of this section that are employed
in the child care industry for more than two months prior to enrollment
in the pilot program; and
(D) Program expenditures, including aid disbursed each month and
-4-

LB95 LB95
2025 2025
average monthly household cost.
(vi) (ii) A licensed child care program that employs a member of an
eligible household shall make reasonable accommodations so that the
eligible applicant or adult household member is not a primary caregiver
to such applicant's or adult household member's child. If reasonable
accommodation cannot be made, the department shall allow the applicant or
adult household member to receive child care assistance for the
applicant's or adult household member's child including when the
applicant or adult household member is the primary caregiver for such
child.
(vii) (iii) A licensed child care provider eligible for the child
care subsidy may enroll the household member's child in a child care
program other than the household member's child care program to receive
child care assistance.
(viii) (iv) Subdivisions (2)(b)(v) (2)(b)(ii) and (2)(b)(vi) (2)(b)
(iii) of this section shall become operative on July 1, 2025. The
department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with these
subdivisions.
(c) For the period beginning July 1, 2021, through September 30,
2026, funds provided to the State of Nebraska pursuant to the Child Care
and Development Block Grant Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 9857 et seq., as such
act and sections existed on January 1, 2023, shall be used to pay the
costs to the state resulting from the income eligibility changes made in
subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section by Laws 2021, LB485. If the
available amount of such funds is insufficient to pay such costs, then
funds provided to the state for the Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families program established in 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq. may also be used.
No General Funds shall be used to pay the costs to the state, other than
administration costs, resulting from the income eligibility changes made
in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section by Laws 2021, LB485, for
the period beginning July 1, 2021, through September 30, 2026.
-5-

LB95 LB95
2025 2025
(d) The Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate
with a private nonprofit organization with expertise in early childhood
care and education for an independent evaluation of the income
eligibility changes made in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section
by Laws 2021, LB485, if private funding is made available for such
purpose. The evaluation shall be completed by July 1, 2024, and shall be
submitted electronically to the department and to the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature.
(3) In determining the rate or rates to be paid by the department
for child care as defined in section 43-2605, the department shall adopt
a fixed-rate schedule for the state or a fixed-rate schedule for an area
of the state applicable to each child care program category of provider
as defined in section 71-1910 which may claim reimbursement for services
provided by the federal Child Care Subsidy program, except that the
department shall not pay a rate higher than that charged by an individual
provider to that provider's private clients. The schedule may provide
separate rates for care for infants, for children with special needs,
including disabilities or technological dependence, or for other
individual categories of children. The schedule may also provide tiered
rates based upon a quality scale rating of step three or higher under the
Step Up to Quality Child Care Act. The schedule shall be effective on
October 1 of every year and shall be revised annually by the department.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-1206, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-6-